District of Columbia statutes.
29-105.04

Amendment of foreign registration statement.

(a)

A registered foreign entity shall deliver to the Mayor for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in the:

(1)

Name of the entity;

(2)

Type of entity, including, if it is a limited partnership, whether the entity became or ceased to be a limited liability limited partnership;

(3)

Jurisdiction of formation;

(4)

Address or addresses required by § 29-105.03(4); or

(5)

Information required by § 29-104.04(a).

(b)

The requirements of § 29-105.03 for an original foreign registration statement apply to an amendment of a foreign registration statement under this section.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(31), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “registered foreign entity” for “foreign entity registered to do business in the District” in the introductory language of (a).